Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Licensure of Elevator Contractors and Mechanics
198B.500.
Safety equipment.

Every passenger elevator or fixed guideway system shall be equipped, maintained, and operated, with respect to the supporting members, elevator or fixed guideway system car, shaftways, guides, cables, doors, and gates, safety stops and mechanism, electrical apparatus and wiring, mechanical apparatus, counterweights, and all other appurtenances, in accordance with the regulations as are authorized in respect thereto. Where reasonable safety is obtained without complying to the literal requirements of the regulations, as in cases of practical difficulty or unnecessary hardship, the literal requirements of the regulations shall not be required.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 13; 1976, ch. 232, § 6; 2006, ch. 157, § 9, effective July 12, 2006.

198B.510.
Certificates of operation — Renewal — Elevator or fixed guideway system installations — Certification of compliance — State inspectors.

No certificate of operation for any passenger elevator or fixed guideway system shall be issued until the elevator or fixed guideway system has been inspected and the inspection report filed with the department. The certificate of operation, when issued, shall bear the date of inspection, and shall be renewed as of the date of the subsequent inspection, provided the inspection is made at least one (1) year after the issuance of this certificate. If the inspection is made during the year the certificate is in force, the renewal date shall be one (1) year from the date of the certificate being renewed and the renewal certificate shall show the date of inspection.

All new elevator or fixed guideway system installations shall be performed by a licensed elevator contractor. Subsequent to installation, the elevator contractor shall certify compliance with the applicable sections of KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540. The licensed elevator contractor shall complete and submit the initial registration for each new installation.

A state inspector shall inspect, in accordance with KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540, all newly installed elevators, platform lifts, and stairway chairlifts in private residences.
(3) (a)

A state inspector shall inspect, in accordance with KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540, all newly installed elevators, platform lifts, and stairway chairlifts in private residences.

A state inspector may inspect, in accordance with KRS 198B.400 to 198B.540, any existing installed elevators, platform lifts, and stairway chairlifts in private residences at the request of the owner of the private residence.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 14; 1976, ch. 232, § 7; 1976, ch. 299, § 82; 2006, ch. 157, § 10, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 269, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
27, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.520.
Permits for erection or repairs — Revocation or expiration of permit — Extension for good cause.

Before any new installation of an elevator or fixed guideway system of permanent nature shall be erected or before any existing elevator is removed to a different location, an application of specifications in duplicate shall be submitted to the department giving such information concerning the construction, installation, and operation of the elevator or fixed guideway system as the department may require on forms to be furnished by the department, together with complete construction plans in duplicate. In all cases where any changes or repairs are made which alter its construction or classification, grade, or rated lifting capacity, except when made pursuant to a report of an inspector, an application of specifications in duplicate shall be submitted to the department containing such information for approval. Upon approval of the application and construction plans, the department shall issue a permit for the erection or repair of the elevator or fixed guideway system. No new elevator or fixed guideway system shall be operated until completion in accordance with the approved plans and specifications, unless a temporary permit is granted by the department.

A permit issued under this section may be revoked by the department when:

A false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact in the application, plans, or specifications led to the issuance of the permit;

The permit was issued in error;

The work detailed under the permit is not being performed in accordance with the application, plans, or specifications;

Work is not being performed in accordance with the code or conditions of the permit; or

The elevator contractor to whom the permit was issued fails or refuses to comply with a lawfully issued stop work order.

A permit issued under this section shall expire if:

The work authorized by permit is not commenced within twenty-four (24) months after the date of issuance, or within a shorter period of time as specified by the department at the time the permit is issued; or

The work is abandoned for a period of sixty (60) days after work commences, or a shorter period of time as specified by the department at the time the permit is issued.

The department shall allow an extension of the allotted period if proof of good cause is provided with a request for an extension.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 15; 1976, ch. 299, § 83; 2006, ch. 157, § 11, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 270, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
28, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.530.
Prohibition — Collected fines to be paid into elevator safety program trust fund.

A person shall not violate any law relative to the operation, construction, maintenance, and repair of passenger elevators or fixed guideway systems. All fines collected for a violation of this section shall be forwarded to the department, which shall pay the same into the State Treasury to the credit of the elevator safety program trust fund as specified in KRS 198B.4037.

History.
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 17; 1976, ch. 232, § 8; 1976, ch. 299, § 84; 2006, ch. 157, § 12, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 271, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 116, §
29, effective July 1, 2011.

198B.540.
Notice of defective machinery — Sealing of dangerous passenger elevator or fixed guideway system.

If the department’s inspector of elevators and fixed guideway systems or a general inspector of elevators or fixed guideway systems finds that a passenger elevator, fixed guideway system, or a part thereof does not afford reasonable safety, the department or the general inspector shall post a notice upon the elevator or fixed guideway system prohibiting further use of the elevator or fixed guideway system until the changes or alterations set forth in the notice have been made to the satisfaction of the department or the inspector. The notice shall contain a statement that operators or passengers are subject to injury by its continued use, a description of the alteration or other change necessary to be made in order to secure safety of operation, date of the notice, and name and signature of the department or inspector issuing the notice.

If any inspector of elevators or fixed guideway systems finds a passenger elevator or fixed guideway system to be so unsafe as can be reasonably expected to offer imminent danger of death or physical injury, that unit shall be sealed out of service, a hazard notice posted thereon, and the department shall be notified immediately of the exact location and condition of the unit.

A passenger elevator or fixed guideway system, once sealed, shall not be operated except for the purpose of effecting repairs and in the manner prescribed by the department, until all defects are corrected and the unit has been inspected and certified as safe by the department.

Sealing shall consist of rendering a passenger elevator unit or fixed guideway system inoperable by disconnecting power or by placing a sealing device on the operation switch and ordering additional measures to be effected by the owner, such as erection of barricades, as may be required to prevent use of or public access to the unit.

No seal, notice, or barricade placed on or around an elevator or fixed guideway system in accordance with this chapter shall be removed, obstructed or in any way altered without the written consent of the department.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 239, § 18; 1976, ch. 232, § 9; 1976, ch. 299, § 85; 1978, ch. 123, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 2006, ch. 157, § 13, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 272, effective July 15, 2010; 2017 ch. 169, § 27, effective June 29, 2017.